Hawaii statutes.
[§349-3.1] Kupuna care program. (a)
The executive office on aging may establish the kupuna care program. The
program shall provide affordable and quality home- and community-based
services.

(b) The program may be provided in every
county as a function of the aging and disability resource centers.

(c) As used in this section, unless the
context otherwise requires:

"Aging and disability resource
centers" means an entity established by the State as part of the state
system of long-term care, serving as a highly visible and trusted source where
people of all incomes and ages can get information on the full range of
long-term support options, and a single point of entry for access to public
long-term support programs and benefits.

"Family caregivers" means a spouse,
adult child, other relative, partner, or friend who has a personal relationship
with, and provides a broad range of unpaid assistance for an older adult with a
chronic or disabling condition.

(d) The director shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section. [L 2012, c 238, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next